Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.065

Relocation assistance advisory services.

(1) Programs or projects undertaken by a displacing agency shall be planned in a manner that (a) recognizes, at an early stage in the planning of the programs or projects and before the commencement of any actions that will cause displacements, the problems associated with the displacement of individuals, families, businesses, and farm operations, and (b) provides for the resolution of the problems in order to minimize adverse impacts on displaced persons and to expedite program or project advancement and completion.

(2) Displacing agencies shall ensure that the relocation assistance advisory services described in subsection (3) of this section are made available to all persons displaced by the agency. If the agency determines that any person occupying property immediately adjacent to the property where the displacing activity occurs is caused substantial economic injury as a result thereof, the agency may make available to the person the advisory services.

(3) Each relocation assistance advisory program required by subsection (2) of this section shall include such measures, facilities, or services as may be necessary or appropriate in order to:

(a) Determine, and make timely recommendations on, the needs and preferences, if any, of displaced persons for relocation assistance;

(b) Provide current and continuing information on the availability, sales prices, and rental charges of comparable replacement dwellings for displaced homeowners and tenants and suitable locations for businesses and farm operations;

(c) Assist a person displaced from a business or farm operation in obtaining and becoming established in a suitable replacement location;

(d) Supply (i) information concerning federal, state, and local programs that may be of assistance to displaced persons, and (ii) technical assistance to the persons in applying for assistance under those programs;

(e) Provide other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships to them in adjusting to relocation; and

(f) Coordinate relocation activities performed by the agency with other federal, state, or local governmental actions in the community that could affect the efficient and effective delivery of relocation assistance and related services.

(4) Notwithstanding *RCW 8.26.020(4)(b), in any case in which a displacing agency acquires property for a program or project, a person who occupies the property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project is eligible for advisory services to the extent determined by the displacing agency.

[ 1988 c 90 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 8.26.020 was amended by 2003 c 254 s 1, changing subsection (4)(b) to subsection (4)(c).

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.